Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GREAT LAKES AQUARIUM.new text end new text begin $1,058,200 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Lake Superior Center Authority to predesign, design, construct, and renovate improvements and betterments of a capital nature at the Great Lakes Aquarium. This appropriation includes money for major projects to preserve or replace mechanical, electrical, and water treatment systems; upgrades to utility systems; life-safety improvements; and exterior improvements to the facility's building envelope, parking, and grounds. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end